de: Trimm- und Neigungsart: Hydraulische Neigung; Manuelle Neigung (ohne Trimmung); Power-Trimm und Tilt; Nur Neigung; Sonstiges
it: Tipo di assetto e inclinazione: Inclinazione idraulica; Inclinazione manuale (senza trim); Power trim e tilt; Solo inclinazione; Altro
en: Trim & tilt type: Hydraulic tilt; Manual tilt (no trim); Power trim & tilt; Tilt only; Other
sk-SK: Typ lemu a náklonu: Hydraulické naklápanie; Manuálne naklápanie (bez trimu); Elektrický trim a naklápanie; Len naklápanie; Iné
bg-BG: Тип наклон и ъгъл: Хидравличен наклон; Ръчен наклон (без трим); Електрически трим и наклон; Само наклон; Друго
sv: Trim- och tilttyp: Hydraulisk tilt; Manuell tilt (inget trim); Power trim och tilt; Endast tilt; Annat
fr: Type de trim et d’inclinaison: Relevage hydraulique; Relevage manuel (sans trim); Trim et relevage électriques; Relevage uniquement; Autre
da: Trim- og tilttype: Hydraulisk tilt; Manuelt tilt (ingen trim); Power-trim og -tilt; Kun tilt; Andet
pt-BR: Trim & tilt tipo: Inclinação hidráulica; Inclinação manual (sem trim); Power trim e inclinação; Apenas inclinação; Outro
vi: Loại điều chỉnh độ nghiêng và nâng hạ: Chỉnh nghiêng thủy lực; Chỉnh nghiêng thủ công (không chỉnh chúi); Chỉnh chúi & nghiêng bằng điện; Chỉ chỉnh nghiêng; Khác
el: Τύπος διαγωγής και κλίσης: Υδραυλική ανύψωση; Χειροκίνητη ανύψωση (χωρίς ρύθμιση κλίσης); Ηλεκτρική ρύθμιση κλίσης και ανύψωση; Μόνο ανύψωση; Άλλο
hr-HR: Vrsta obruba i nagiba: Hidraulični nagib; Ručni nagib (bez trima); Električni trim i nagib; Samo nagib; Ostalo
ru: Тип регулировки наклона: Гидравлический наклон; Ручной наклон (без трима); Электрический трим и наклон; Только наклон; Другое
th: ประเภทปรับระดับและเอียง: ปรับความเอียงด้วยไฮดรอลิก; ปรับความเอียงด้วยมือ (ไม่มีทริม); ทริมและทิลต์ด้วยระบบไฟฟ้า; ปรับความเอียงเท่านั้น; อื่นๆ
tr: Trim ve tilt tipi: Hidrolik tilt; Manuel tilt (trim yok); Elektrikli trim ve tilt; Sadece tilt; Diğer
es: Tipo de ribete e inclinación: Inclinación hidráulica; Inclinación manual (sin compensación); Compensación e inclinación eléctrica; Solo inclinación; Otro
zh-TW: 傾斜與微調類型: 液壓傾斜; 手動傾斜 (無微調); 電動微調與傾斜; 僅傾斜; 其他
cs: Typ naklápění: Hydraulické naklápění; Manuální naklápění (bez trimování); Elektrické trimování a naklápění; Pouze naklápění; Ostatní
pl: Typ trimu i tiltu: Odchylanie hydrauliczne; Odchylanie ręczne (bez trymowania); Elektryczne trymowanie i odchylanie; Tylko odchylanie; Inne
ko: 트림/틸트 유형: 유압식 틸트; 수동 틸트(트림 없음); 파워 트림 및 틸트; 틸트 전용; 기타
lt-LT: Apkirpimo ir pakreipimo tipas: Hidraulinis posvyris; Rankinis posvyris; Elektrinis diferentas ir posvyris; Tik posvyris; Kita
nb: Trim- og tilttype: Hydraulisk tilt; Manuell tilt (ingen trim); Power trim og tilt; Kun tilt; Annet
ro-RO: Tipul de asietă și înclinare: Înclinare hidraulică; Înclinare manuală (fără trim); Trim și înclinare electrice; Doar înclinare; Altele
hu: Trim és dőlésszög-állítás típusa: Hidraulikus billentés; Kézi billentés (trimmelés nélkül); Elektromos trimmelés és billentés; Csak billentés; Egyéb
nl: Trim- & tilt type: Hydraulisch kantelen; Handmatig kantelen (geen trim); Elektrisch trimmen en kantelen; Alleen kantelen; Anders
zh-CN: 倾斜与升降类型: 液压倾斜; 手动倾斜（无微调）; 电动微调和倾斜; 仅倾斜; 其他
sl-SI: Vrsta sistema za nagib in dvig: Hidravlični nagib; Ročni nagib (brez trima); Električni trim in nagib; Samo nagib; Drugo
pt-PT: Tipo de acabamento e inclinação: Inclinação hidráulica; Inclinação manual (sem compensação); Compensação e inclinação elétrica; Apenas inclinação; Outro
ja: トリム＆チルトタイプ: 油圧式チルト; マニュアルチルト (トリムなし); パワートリム＆チルト; チルトのみ; その他
fi: Trimmauksen ja kallistuksen tyyppi: Hydraulinen kippi; Manuaalinen kippi (ei trimmiä); Sähkötrimmi ja -kippi; Vain kippi; Muu